Missouri, session 2026, SB1622.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 67.107, to read as
follows:
67.107. 1. A city, town, village, county, or other
political subdivision shall not take into account, or give
preference to any person or entity, based on race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran
status, or familial status when awarding contracts.
2. Any person who intentionally or knowingly violates
this section shall be subject to a fine of one hundred
thousand dollars.
✓